Louisiana, session 2026, SB469.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1749.12, 1749.13(B)(6), 1749.14(C)(2) and (4), 1749.18(B)(4),
and 1749.19 are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1749.13(F) and 1749.23(B)(4)
are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1749.12. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to them
in this Section:
(1) "Agricultural excavator" means a person who owns or operates a farm and
is directly involved in the cultivation of land or crops or who raises livestock.
(2) "Clear or no conflict" means a response provided by an owner or
operator of underground utilities or facilities when the owner or operator
determines that its facilities or utilities are not in conflict with the proposed area
of excavation.
(2)(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of conservation.
(3)(4) "Damage" means any defacing, scraping, gouging, breaking, cutting,
or displacement of, impact upon or removal of an underground facility or utility or
its means of primary support.
(4)(5) "Demolisher" means any person engaged in the act of demolishing as
defined in Paragraph (2)(6) of this Section.
(5)(6) "Demolition" means the total or partial wrecking, razing, rendering,
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
moving, or removing of any building or structure, movable or immovable.
(6)(7) "Emergency" means any crisis situation which poses an imminent
threat or danger to life, health, or property, which requires immediate action, if such
action is taken. The term also includes an unplanned utility outage, which requires
immediate action, if such action is taken.
(7)(8) "Excavation" or "excavate" means any operation causing movement
or removal of earth, rock, or other materials in or on the ground or submerged in a
marine environment that could reasonably result in damage to underground or
submerged utilities or facilities by the use of powered or mechanical or manual
means, including but not limited to pile driving, digging, blasting, augering, boring,
back filling, dredging, compaction, plowing-in, trenching, ditching, tunneling,
land-leveling, grading, and mechanical probing. "Excavation" or "excavate" shall not
include manual probing, normal commercial farming operations, or any activity
resulting from force majeure related occurrences, including but not limited to an act
of God or an act of nature.
(8)(9) "Excavator" means any person who engages in excavation operations.
(9)(10) "Forestry excavator" means an excavator who is a logger, prescribed
burner, site preparation operator, or tree planter for commercial forestry operations.
(10)(11) "Inclement weather" means weather that prohibits or impedes a
worker's use of his locating equipment or causes undue risk to himself or his
equipment such as lightning, heavy rain, tornadoes, hurricanes, floods, sleet, snow,
or flooding conditions.
(11)(12) "Large project excavation or demolition" means excavation or
demolition activity within a contiguous area that cannot reasonably be completed
within twenty calendar days for routine demolition or excavation or within thirty
calendar days for agricultural, forestry, or marine excavation or demolition activity.
(13) "Locate request" means a communication between an excavator or
demolisher and the regional notification center in which a request for locating
underground utilities or facilities is processed.
(12)(14) "Marine excavator" means an excavator or demolisher who is
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
performing excavation or demolition in areas such as swamps, wetlands, shallow
water, waterways, rivers, bayous, bays, lakes, the sea, and arms of the sea.
(13)(15) "Mark-by time" is the date and time provided by the regional
notification center by which the utility or facility operator is required to mark the
location or provide information to enable an excavator or demolisher, using
reasonable and prudent means, to determine the specific location of the utility or
facility as provided for in R.S. 40:1749.14(D). The mark-by time may be extended
if mutually agreed upon and documented between the excavator and operator.
(14)(16) "Normal commercial farming operations" means the following
operations or activities for agriculture cultivation purposes:
(a) Operations or activities that do not encroach upon a private utility or
pipeline servitude, public right-of-way, or a public franchise area.
(b) Operations or activities that do encroach upon a private utility or pipeline
servitude and the depth of the excavation is less than twelve inches in the soil below
the existing surface grade.
(15)(17) "Operator" means any person who owns or operates a public or
private underground facility or utility which furnishes a service or material or stores,
transports, or transmits electric energy, steam, oil, gases, natural gas, gas, mixture
of gases, petroleum, petroleum products, hazardous or flammable fluids, toxic or
corrosive fluids/gases fluids or gases, including telephone or telegraph system, fiber
optic electronic communication systems, or water or water systems, or drainage,
sewer systems, or traffic control systems or other items of like nature.
(16)(18) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, association, limited
liability company, corporation, joint venture, municipality, governmental agency,
political subdivision, or agent of the state or any legal representative thereof.
(17)(19) "Pipeline" means all intrastate and interstate pipeline facilities
defined by 49 CFR 192.3 and 49 CFR 195.2.
(20) "Positive response" means once a facility owner or facility operator
marks the location of existing facilities in the proposed excavation area or
determines that excavation or demolition is not in conflict with any existing
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
underground facilities, the facility owner or facility operator then notifies the
excavator of the status of the location request ticket by appropriate response
through the regional notification center's positive response system.
(18)(21) "Regional notification center" means any one of the following:
(a) An entity designated as nonprofit by the Internal Revenue Service under
pursuant to Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and which is organized to
protect its members from damage and is certified by the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections in accordance with this Part.
(b) An organization of operators, consisting of two or more separate operators
who jointly have underground utilities or facilities in three or more parishes in
Louisiana, which is organized to protect its own installation from damage and has
been certified by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections in accordance
with this Part.
(c) An operator who has underground utilities or facilities in a majority of
parishes in Louisiana and is organized to protect its own installation from damage,
and has been certified by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections in
accordance with this Part.
(19)(22) "Routine excavation or demolition" means excavation or demolition
activity that requires no more than twenty calendar days to be completed, and no
more than thirty calendar days for agricultural, forestry, or marine excavation or
demolition activity.
(20)(23) "Service line or lines" means underground facilities or utilities
which provide power, gas, natural gas, communication, or water capabilities to a
building or structure or buildings or group of structures.
(24) "Ticket" means the notification sent by the regional notification
center to any owner or operator who has a facility located within the proposed
area of excavation.
(25) "Ticket number" means a unique identification number assigned by
the regional notification center to each locate request.
(21)(26) "Underground facility or utility" means any pipe, conduit, duct,
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
wire, cable, valve, line, fiber optic equipment, or other structure which is buried or
placed below ground or submerged for use in connection with storage, conveyance,
transmission, or protection of electronics communication system, telephone or
telegraph system, or fiber optic, electric energy, oil, natural gas, gas, gases, steam,
mixture of gases, petroleum, petroleum products, hazardous or flammable
fluids/gases fluids or gases, toxic or corrosive fluids/gases fluids or gases,
hazardous fluids/gases fluids or gases, or other substances of like nature or water or
water systems, sewer systems or traffic, drainage control systems, or other items of
like nature.
(22)(27) "Wildfire" means an uncontrolled combustion of natural vegetation.
§1749.13. Excavation and demolition; prohibitions
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(6) At least one person on any underground or submerged excavation or
demolition site shall have proof of completion of the training and education provided
by the Regional Notification Center. Training is required on an annual basis through
the Regional Notification Center and shall be available through its website free of
charge. Excavators or demolishers engaged in logging operations, or those who
have been certified by an operator qualification program subject to Title 49, CFR,
Part 192 or Part 195, shall be exempt from this requirement.
* * *
F.(1) The provisions of this Subsection shall apply only to excavation
activities performed in connection with broadband development projects
funded in whole or in part through the Broadband Equity, Access, and
Deployment, or BEAD, Program.
(2) Prior to commencing excavation on a BEAD-funded broadband
project, an excavator shall provide not less than thirty days advance notice to
all operators with underground facilities located in the proposed project area
by utilizing the regional notification center's large project excavation or
demolition locate request. The notice required by this Paragraph is separate
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
from and in addition to the notice requirements provided in R.S. 51:2370.35(A).
(3) After providing thirty days advanced notice, but prior to the
requirements of R.S. 40:1749.13(B), the excavator or demolisher and the
operator having facilities within the excavation project area shall attempt in
good faith to enter into a mutual written agreement that shall determine the
scope of work, the mark-by-times, and any other project-specific coordination
requirements. The agreement shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned,
or delayed. In the event the parties are unable to reach a mutual written
agreement, excavation shall not be delayed on that basis alone. The operator
may comply with either of the following:
(a) The standard marking requirements and timelines set forth in this
Chapter.
(b) At the operator's election, any marking schedule or coordination
agreement already agreed to by other operators for the same excavation
project. Nothing in this Section shall relieve any party of its obligations
pursuant to this Chapter.
(4) Each executed written agreement shall be electronically uploaded by
the excavator or demolisher to the regional notification center and attached to
the applicable large project excavation or demolition ticket. The written
agreement shall be available at the excavation site for inspection.
(5) If facility markings are not visible at the time excavation is to
commence, and no positive response has been provided by the operator with any
underground utility or facility in conflict in the proposed area of excavation, the
excavator shall not begin excavation until documented notice is made to the
operator of the underground utility or facility. The operator shall have three
hours from the time documented notice is made to either mark the facility or
provide a positive response that there is no conflict. If the operator fails to
respond within three hours of the documented notice, the excavation may
commence with the excavator or demolisher exercising due care to protect any
underground utility or facility within the area of excavation.
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
(6) Any excavator or demolisher performing excavation activities in the
public right-of-way pursuant to a BEAD-funded broadband project shall
display, at the excavation site, signage identifying the excavator, demolisher or
their agents or contractors, the broadband service provider for whom the work
is being performed, and a telephone number or email address for project
inquiries.
(7) Each project shall comply with the provisions of this Part.
(8) The provisions of this Subsection shall terminate on August 1, 2030.
§1749.14. Regional notification center
* * *
C.(1) * * *
(2) If the operator does not visibly mark the location of these utilities or
facilities, the operator shall provide information to enable an excavator using
reasonable and prudent means to determine the approximate location of the utility
or facility including but not limited to written or electronic information in the
form of maps, drawings, or GPS coordinates showing any potential conflicts
within the area of planned excavation. The information provided by the operator
shall include a contact person and a specific telephone number for the excavators to
call. After the operator has received the notification request, the information on
location, size, and type of underground utility or facility must shall be provided by
the operator to the excavator prior to excavation.
* * *
(4) Should an underground utility or facility operator determine that its
underground facilities are not in conflict with the location of the request or determine
that its underground facilities are not fully marked for locating purposes, a
notification shall be sent to the excavator prior to the mark-by time. A notification
to the regional notification center that generated the location request shall suffice for
compliance with this Section as it pertains to positive response A facility operator
shall provide a positive response through the regional notification center before
expiration of the time allowed for marking. The response shall indicate whether
Page 7 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
the operator's facilities are present and marked, not present, or that additional
time is required.
* * *
§1749.18. Certification of a regional notification center by Department of Public
Safety and Corrections
* * *
B. For the purposes of promoting cost effectiveness, ease of use, safety, and
the protection of property, workmen, and citizens from damage, injury, and death,
the rules and regulations shall include but not be limited to requirements that any
regional notification center, that is either certified or that applies for certification
pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, shall have and maintain the following:
* * *
(4)(a) Specifically defined geopolitical services areas that are coterminous
with parish boundaries and do not overlap any other defined service area.
(b) The provisions of this Paragraph shall apply only to those regional
notification centers described in R.S. 40:1749.12(13)(a)(21)(a).
* * *
§1749.19. Voluntary participation by incorporated municipalities and parish
governments
A. Each incorporated municipality or parish government having a
population of not less than three hundred eighty-three thousand nine hundred
and not more than four hundred forty thousand eight hundred persons
according to the most recent federal decennial census, which owns or operates,
in its own right or through a special district or districts created pursuant to
constitutional, home rule, or statutory authority, a drainage system, a sewer system,
drainage, water or water system, telephone or telegraph, fiber optic, electronics
equipment system, traffic control system, or an electrical energy system and/or a
gas or natural gas system underground facility within its local jurisdiction which
would otherwise be included in R.S. 40:1749.14, and which does not desire to be so
included, shall adopt an ordinance indicating this desire by adopted an ordinance
Page 8 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
on or before December 31, 1998, indicating its desire to be excluded from the
provisions of R.S. 40:1749.14 shall be exempt from the requirements of R.S.
40:1749.14. This exemption shall apply to all such systems that are owned or
operated by the incorporated municipality or parish government in its own
right or through a special district or districts, including those systems existing
at the time that the incorporated municipality or parish government adopted
the ordinance indicating its desire to be excluded from the provisions of R.S.
40:1749.14 and those subsequently established or acquired. Each exempt
incorporated municipality, parish government, and public utility shall maintain
a permitting process or other established procedure through which a permittee
may obtain, if available, information regarding the approximate location of
such systems owned or operated by the incorporated municipality, parish
government, or public utility that are situated in the immediate vicinity of the
permitted work or area of excavation. Any incorporated municipality having
a population of not less than sixty-six thousand and not more than sixty-six
thousand five hundred persons according to the most recent federal decennial
census shall be exempt from the requirements of R.S. 40:1749.14. Each exempt
incorporated municipality shall maintain a permitting process or other
established procedure through which a permittee may obtain, if available,
information regarding the approximate location of such systems owned or
operated by the incorporated municipality that are in the immediate vicinity of
the permitted work or area of excavation. The ordinance shall be filed with the
secretary of state for verification purposes. An incorporated municipality or parish
government which fails to adopt the ordinance shall be subject to the provisions of
this Part on and after December 31, 1998.
B. Each municipality or parish government which owns or operates in its own
right, or through a special district or districts created pursuant to law, a drainage
system, a sewer system, water or water system, telephone or telegraph, fiber optic,
electronics equipment system, traffic control system, an electrical energy system,
natural gas system, and/or a gas system underground facility within its local
Page 9 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 469 ENROLLED
jurisdiction which would otherwise be included in R.S. 40:1749.17, and which is
incorporated or created subsequent to July 1, 1997, and which does not desire to be
so included, shall comply with the provisions of Subsection A of this Section within
one year of the date of its first municipal elections or within one year of the date of
creation of a special district.
* * *
§1749.23. Enforcement and adjudication; administration; levy of civil penalties
* * *
B. The deputy secretary for the office of public safety services in the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections or any local law enforcement agency
shall have the right to:
* * *
(4) Order the cessation of excavation or demolition activities when the
officer has reasonable cause to believe the excavator is operating in violation of
this Part. Excavation or demolition shall not resume until the excavator
demonstrates compliance with this Part. For the purposes of this Paragraph,
"reasonable cause" means articulable facts observed by the officer that would
lead a reasonable person to believe that a violation of this Part is occurring or
is about to occur, including but not limited to the absence of a valid locate
ticket, an expired ticket, excavation within unmarked or improperly marked
areas, or other observable noncompliance pursuant to this Part.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.